Kentucky statutes. TITLE XX Alcoholic Beverages
Definitions

242.010.
Definitions. [Repealed.]

242.015.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in KRS

241.010

have the meaning given to them in KRS

241.010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 435, § 4, effective July 14, 2000.